District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Glazier Licensing Standards and Certification Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter I-B of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official
Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new designation for part F-ii to read as
follows:
“Part F-ii.
“Glazier Licensing and Certification.
“47-2853.100. Definitions.
“47-2853.100a. Eligibility requirements; AGMT certification.
“47-2853.100b. Representations and advertising.
“47-2853.100c. Temporary license.
“47-2853.100d. Fees; rules.”.
(b) Section 47-2853.04(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs (18A) and (18B) to read
as follows:
“(18A) Glazier;
“(18B) Glazing contractor;
(c) Section 47-2853.06(d) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “consisting of 15 members,” and insert the phrase
“consisting of 17 members,” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “and one shall be a consumer member” and insert the phrase
“one shall be a glazier licensed in the District, one shall be a glazing contractor licensed in the
District, and one shall be a consumer member” in its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Strike the phrase “and elevator contractors.” and insert the phrase “elevator
contractors, glaziers, and glazing contractors.” in its place.
(c) A new part F-ii is added to read as follows:
“Part F-ii.
“Glazier Licensing and Certification.
“§ 47-2853.100. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this part, the term:
“(1) “Board” means the Board of Industrial Trades.
“(2) “Glazier” means any person who erects, constructs, installs, alters, services,
or repairs aluminum windows, curtain walls, interior glass partitions, glass handrails, aluminum
entrances, skylights, and storefronts, and general architectural glass and metal installation.
“(3) “Glazing contractor” means a sole proprietor, firm, or corporation who, for
compensation, engages in erecting, constructing, installing, altering, servicing, and repairing
aluminum windows, curtain walls, interior glass partitions, glass handrails, aluminum entrances,
skylights, and storefronts, and general architectural glass and metal installation.
“§ 47-2853.100a. Eligibility requirements.
“(a) The Board shall regulate and license glaziers and glazing contractors to ensure that
persons engaged in those occupations conform to applicable national safety and performance
standards.
“(b)(1) An applicant for licensure as a glazing contractor shall establish to the satisfaction
of the Board that the applicant:
“(A) Has under their employ no less than 3 licensed or temporarily
licensed glaziers who perform the work described by the applicant in the application;
“(B) Has complied with the bonding and insurance requirements
established by rulemaking; and
“(C) Meets any other requirements established by the Mayor through
rulemaking.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, until rules are promulgated
pursuant to paragraph (1)(C) of this subsection, the Board may issue a 2-year license to an
applicant who:
“(A) Has under their employ no less than 3 licensed or temporarily
licensed glaziers who perform the work described by the applicant in the application; and
“(B) Has complied with applicable bonding and insurance requirements
established by the Board.
“(c)(1) An applicant for licensure as a glazier shall establish to the satisfaction of the
Board that the applicant:
“(A) Has passed an examination on glazing that is acceptable to the Board;
“(B) Has a certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
glaziers that is registered with the Bureau of Apprenticeship Training, U.S. Department of Labor,
the District of Columbia Apprenticeship Council, or an equivalent state’s apprenticeship council;
or
“(C) Has comparable experience or a combination of education and
experience that the Board deems equivalent to the above; and
“(D) Meets any other requirements established by the Mayor through
rulemaking.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, until rules are promulgated
pursuant to paragraph (1)(D) of this subsection, the Board may issue a 2-year license to an
applicant who:
“(A) Has a certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for
Glazier registered with the Bureau of Apprenticeship Training, U.S. Department of Labor, the
District of Columbia Apprenticeship Council, or an equivalent state’s apprenticeship council; or
“(B) Has passed an examination on glazing acceptable to the Board.
“§ 47-2853.100b. Representations and advertising.
“(a) Unless licensed in accordance with this part, no person shall use the words or terms
“licensed glazier” or any words to imply that the person is licensed to perform the services of a
glazier in the District.
“§ 47-2853.100c. Temporary license.
“(a) Notwithstanding § 47-2853.100a, in the event of emergency circumstances, the
Board may, pursuant to rule, issue a temporary license for a period not to exceed 30 days.
“§ 47-2853.100d. Rules.
“(a)(1) No later than one year after the effective date of this part, the Mayor, pursuant to
§ 2-501 et seq., shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this part; provided, that both a
glazier representative and glazing contractor representative have been appointed to the Board as
required by § 47-2853.06(d).
“(2) If a glazier representative and glazing contractor representative are not
appointed within 180 days after the effective date of this part, the Mayor shall begin the
rulemaking process to implement the provisions of this part, to be complete within no later than
one year after the effective date.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4